Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.510

Transmittal of education records—Disclosure of education records—Data-sharing agreements.

(1) In order to effectively serve students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding, education records shall be transmitted to the department of children, youth, and families, the appropriate federally recognized Indian tribe, or the state agency responsible for the implementation of the unaccompanied refugee minors program within two school days after receiving the request from the department, federally recognized Indian tribe, or state agency provided that the department, the appropriate federally recognized Indian tribe, or the state agency responsible for the implementation of the unaccompanied refugee minors program certifies that it will not disclose to any other party the education records without prior written consent of the parent or student unless authorized to disclose the records under state law. The department of children, youth, and families is authorized to disclose education records it obtains pursuant to this section to a foster parent, guardian, or other entity authorized by the department to provide residential care to the student. The department is also authorized to disclose educational [education] records it obtains pursuant to this section to those entities with which it has contracted, or with which it is formally collaborating, having responsibility for educational support services and educational outcomes of students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW. The department is encouraged to put in place data-sharing agreements to assure accountability.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding" means a child or youth who is located in Washington state, and who is:

(a) The subject of a shelter care or dependency order issued pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW or an equivalent order of a tribal court of a federally recognized Indian tribe; or

(b) Eligible for benefits under the federal foster care system as defined in RCW 28B.117.020.

[ 2022 c 78 s 1; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 336; 2012 c 163 s 9; 2008 c 297 s 5; 2000 c 88 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Findings—Effective date—2012 c 163: See notes following RCW 28B.117.010.